src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
amā+A:aʼm A_AMĀ  "kaikki" ;
aššõ+A:aššõ A_AŠŠÕ  "äkillinen" ;
argiļ+A:aʼrgiļ A_ǬʼBIĻ  "haarainen" ;
blēḑ+A:blēʼḑ A_BLĒʼḐ  "veitikkamainen" ;
brī+A:brī A_BRĪ  "vapaa" ;
drūošõ+A:drūʼošõ A_DRŪʼOŠÕ  "rohkea" ;
dullõnz+A:dullõn A_DULLÕNZ  "hourupäinen" ;
dōŗa+A:dōŗŗa A_JǬRA  "omapäinen" ;
grinā+A:griʼnnā A_PADĀ  "kiukkuinen" ;
ilmõsītõ+A:ilmõ#sītõ A_NIŖȚ  "viaton" ;
individuāl+A:individuāl A_ANALĪZ  "individuaalinen" ;
jutā+A:juttā A_KÄPĀ  "raidallinen" ;
kad+A:kaʼd A_NIʼM  "kateellinen" ;
klīen+A:klīen A_IRM  "hentokasvuinen" ;
knap+A:knap A_KIM  "pieni" ;
knaš+A:knaš A_KAŠ  "kaunis" ;
kräbīļ+A:kräbīļ A_TARĪĻ  "vaikeasti luettava" ;
kudtõd+A:kuʼdtõd A_  "neulottu" ;
käbrāz+A:käʼbrāz A_KÄBRĀZ  "ripeä" ;
kõl+A:kõʼl A_KÕʼL  "kalsea" ;
kīļaz+A:kīļļa A_PŪŖAZ  "sileä" ;
kūja+A:kūja A_KŪJA  "kuiva" ;
kūjastõd+A:kūjastõ A_TAPTÕD  "savustettu" ;
laigā+A:laʼig A_AIGĀ  "leveä" ;
laigīm+A:laigīm A_SIDĀM  "leveämpi" ;
lajā+A:laʼj A_KALĀ  "laiha" ;
latīņ+A:latīņ A_-ZERO  "latinalainen" ;
laigit+A:laʼigit A_SAʼGDIT  "laajuinen" ;
lem+A:lem A_KIM  "lämmin" ;
leņtš+A:leņtš A_DAŅTŠ  "ilman vettä" ;
lebvīdõb+A:leʼb#vīdõb A_KǬRAND  "toteutettava" ;
lindbrī+A:lind#brī A_BRĪ  "lainsuojaton" ;
lodžā+A:loʼdžā A_DADŽĀ  "nuokuksissa" ;
lomākõz+A:lomākõz A_ARĀGÕZ  "hidas" ;
loppõn+A:loppõn A_  "loppunut" ;
loḑ+A:loʼḑ A_PIʼŅ  "lokainen" ;
loḑ+A:loʼḑ A_PIʼŅ  "veltto" ;
luoik+A:luoik A_KAND  "alhainen" ;
lumvālda+A:luʼm#vālda A_ĀITA  "lumivalkoinen" ;
läkā+A:läkkā A_KÄPĀ  "pliisu" ;
lõpsnā+A:lõpsnā A_MAKSĀ  "kohtelias" ;
lāška+A:lāiska A_ŪŠKA  "laiska" ;
līngaz+A:līngaz A_NÕTKĀZ  "rauhallinen" ;
lōnkaz+A:lōnka A_ĀMBAZ  "ontuva" ;
lōrkatõks+A:lōrkatõks A_KĒRATÕKS  "homssuinen" ;
lūos+A:lūos A_FAKT  "voikko" ;
lǟlam+A:lǟlam A_TŪOITÕG  "vaikea" ;
lǟnd+A:lǟʼnd A_LǞʼND  "mennyt" ;
maigāz+A:maʼigāz A_MAIGĀZ  "perso" ;
mettõrpitkit+A:mettõr#pitkit A_ĀIGAST  "metrin pituinen" ;
mustā+A:mustā A_MAKSĀ  "musta" ;
mīerig+A:mīʼerig A_ȬʼDÕG  "rauhallinen" ;
mūsuglimi+A:mū#suʼglimi A_LĒʼMI  "muunlainen" ;
nõrkõn+A:nõrkõn A_ÄʼGGÕZ  "nääntynyt" ;
nõrī+A:nõrī A_TORĪ  "jäykkä" ;
nõtkāz+A:nõtkāz A_NÕTKĀZ  "notkea" ;
nõddõr+A:nõʼddõr A_BÄʼZMÕR  "kehno" ;
nūoŗ+A:nūoŗ A_JŪŖ  "nuori" ;
nȭrka+A:nȭrka A_ĀITA  "heikko" ;
nȭŗkaz+A:nȭŗka A_ĀMBAZ  "voimaton" ;
ouki+A:ōuki A_OUKI  "reikäinen" ;
ovār+A:ovār A_TIDĀR  "avomielinen" ;
ovtõd+A:oʼvtõ A_TĪʼEDÕD  "kunnioitettu" ;
paralēl+A:paralēl A_AMĀT  "paralleelinen" ;
parām+A:parām A_SIDĀM  "parempi" ;
parāz+A:parāz A_ALĪZ  "sopiva" ;
paŗī+A:paŗŗī A_PAŖĪ  "sopiva" ;
pebbõrz+A:peʼbbõr A_AŅGÕRZ  "möyheä" ;
pivā+A:piʼv A_TUBĀ  "pyhä" ;
piški+A:piški A_KAȚKI  "pieni" ;
pimdõ+A:piʼmdõ A_NǬʼGÕ  "pimeä" ;
populār+A:populār A_AMĀT  "suosittu" ;
porī+A:porī A_TORĪ  "murea" ;
priš+A:priš A_VIŠ  "tuore" ;
pīep+A:pīʼep A_VAʼIT  "sienimäinen" ;
pūolpōļaz+A:pūol#pǭļļaz A_PǬĻAZ  "puolialaston" ;
pūoltäuž+A:pūol#täuž A_TÄUŽ  "puolitäynnä" ;
pōr+A:pǭr A_IRM  "pari" ;
pȭda+A:pȭuda A_MȬKA  "hiostava" ;
rank+A:raʼnk A_NĪʼEM  "hutera" ;
rikāz+A:rik A_RIKĀZ  "rikas" ;
rubīžaigi+A:rubīž#aʼigi A_AʼIGI  "rajaseudun" ;
rušk+A:rušk A_FAKT  "kuparinruskea" ;
rõkki+A:rõkki A_KUKKI  "puhelias" ;
rīț+A:rīț A_VIĻȚ  "matala" ;
rōza+A:rōza A_LILLA  "pinkki" ;
saksā+A:saksā A_OKSĀ  "saksalainen" ;
sangdõvȯitõ+A:sangdõ#vȯitõ A_SIELDÕ  "paksuhko" ;
saņț+A:saņț A_NIŖȚ  "kurja" ;
setmiņsugli+A:setmiņ#suʼgli A_SĒMI  "monenlaatuinen" ;
sizālpolitīkli+A:sizālpolitīkli A_AʼBLI  "sisäpoliittinen" ;
sinvannit+A:siʼn#vannʼit A_SAʼGDIT  "sinun ikäinen" ;
smouļ+A:smouļ A_VIĻȚ  "nutipäinen" ;
spitš+A:spitš A_OKŠ  "terävä" ;
suoḑīkšiji+A:suoḑīkšiji A_AKKIJI  "sotaisa" ;
sīend+A:sīen A_SĪEND  "kylläinen" ;
sīkstõ+A:sīʼkstõ A_NǬʼGÕ  "saita" ;
sūr+A:sūr A_SŪR  "suuri" ;
sūrmi+A:sūrmi A_TŪĻI  "ryynimäinen" ;
sūŗim+A:sūŗim A_TŪOITÕG  "isompi" ;
sȭitaji+A:sȭitaji A_SĒJI  "kykenevä" ;
tajā+A:taʼj A_TUBĀ  "kuiva" ;
taptõd+A:taptõ A_TAPTÕD  "tapettu" ;
tig+A:tiʼg A_KIʼV  "matalamielinen" ;
toņ+A:toņ A_EĻ  "sakea ja kuiva" ;
tumšõ+A:tumšõ A_AŠŠÕ  "pimeä" ;
täudkazzõn+A:täud#kaʼzzõn A_ǬʼRÕN  "täysi-ikäinen" ;
täuž+A:täuž A_TÄUŽ  "täysi" ;
tēriņtõb+A:tēriņtõb A_KǬRAND  "tervetullut" ;
tīedõd+A:tīʼedõ A_TĪʼEDÕD  "tehty" ;
tīera+A:tīerra A_TĪERA  "terve" ;
tūorõz+A:tūorõ A_VȬRÕZ  "raaka" ;
ukkõlǟnd+A:ukkõ#lǟʼnd A_LǞʼND  "mennyt pilalle" ;
ul+A:ūl A_UL  "hullu" ;
vabā+A:vaʼbbā A_PADĀ  "vapaa" ;
vabāilā+A:vabā#iʼl A_KALĀ  "ulkoilma-" ;
vaigā+A:vaʼig A_AIGĀ  "matala" ;
vaļmõz+A:vaļmõz A_MÕTKÕZ  "valmis" ;
vaitõb+A:vaʼitõb A_ȬʼDÕG  "painokas" ;
valdziklilla+A:vaʼldzik#lilla A_LILLA  "sinipunertava" ;
verri+A:veʼrri A_PUʼNNI  "verinen" ;
vingõr+A:vingõr A_KĪNDÕR  "notkea" ;
vizā+A:viʼz A_IZĀ  "kova" ;
viš+A:viš A_VIŠ  "vahva" ;
vil+A:viʼl A_NIʼM  "viileä" ;
väng+A:väng A_KAND  "inhottava" ;
võimõt+A:võimõt A_-ZERO  "mahdoton" ;
vāldiņ+A:vāldiņ A_ĀNKAŖ  "aukinainen" ;
vēļa+A:vēļļa A_KĒRA  "harva" ;
vīegiji+A:vīʼegiji A_LĒʼJI  "valikoiva" ;
vīrlikizōļaz+A:vīʼrlikiz#ǭļļaz A_PǬĻAZ  "kellertävänvihreä" ;
vȭrõmō+A:vȭrõ#mǭ A_PŪ  "muukalainen" ;
ändi+A:ǟndi A_AIGI  "toissa-" ;
äbknaš+A:äʼb#knaš A_KAŠ  "ruma" ;
ārga+A:ārg A_ĀIGA  "arka" ;
īpiž+A:īpiž A_VARĪKŠ  "erikoinen" ;
škīelsīlma+A:škīel#sīlma A_SĪLMA  "kierosilmäinen" ;
šnärbõl+A:šnärbõl A_APPÕN  "jyrsitty" ;
švakkõ+A:švakkõ A_SIELDÕ  "kehno" ;
ūnd+A:ūn A_SĪEND  "kypsä" ;
ūž+A:ūd A_ŪŽ  "uusi" ;
ōra+A:ǭrra A_JǬRA  "harva" ;
ōdõz+A:ǭʼdõ A_PŪʼDÕZ  "kapea" ;
kompakt+A:kompakt A_ĀIGAST  "kompakti" ;
korporatīv+A:korporatīv A_ANALĪZ  "korporatiivinen" ;
äbvizā+A:äʼb#viʼz A_IZĀ  "epävarma" ;
